Illinois, session 104th, HB1268.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the School 5Materials and Activities Report for Transparency Law. 6    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 710-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 8    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)9    Sec. 10-20.88. Learning materials and activities report.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Activities" includes, but is not limited to, student 12assemblies, guest lectures, educational events facilitated by 13a school's administration or staff, or educational events 14conducted by outside individuals or organizations. 15"Activities" does not include student presentations.16    "Learning materials" includes, but is not limited to, any 17of the following:18        (1) Instructional material that consists of content 19    that conveys to a student through a medium or a 20    combination of media the essential knowledge, information, 21    and skills pertaining to a subject included in a public 22    school curriculum. In this paragraph (1), "instructional   HB1268- 2 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1    material" includes a book or books; workbooks; 2    supplementary materials; a combination of a book or books, 3    workbooks, and supplementary materials; computer software, 4    magnetic media, DVDs, CD-ROMs, computer courseware, online 5    services, or an electronic medium; or other means of 6    conveying information to a student or otherwise 7    contributing to the learning process through electronic 8    means, including through open education resource 9    instructional material as described in paragraph (2) of 10    this definition.11        (2) Open education resource instructional material 12    that consists of teaching, learning, and research 13    resources that reside in the public domain or have been 14    released under an intellectual property license and allows 15    for the free use, reuse, modification, and sharing of 16    resources with others. In this paragraph (2), "open 17    education resource instructional material" includes full 18    courses, course materials, modules, textbooks, streaming 19    videos, tests or exams, software, or any other tools, 20    materials, or techniques used to support access to 21    knowledge and also includes State-developed open education 22    resource instructional material.23        (3) Teaching aids.24        (4) Any other material for student instruction in 25    which a student has the option to select the material.26    "Used for student instruction" means assigned, provided,   HB1268- 3 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1or otherwise presented to a school's students in (i) any 2course for which students receive academic credit or (ii) any 3educational capacity in which participation of the student 4body is required by the school or in which a majority of the 5students in a particular grade level participate.6    (b) By July 15 of each year, the school board of each 7school district with 300 or more students enrolled during the 8previous school year shall report for each of the district's 9schools the following information in a prominent location on 10the district's website:11        (1) A list of the learning materials and activities 12    that were used for student instruction during the previous 13    school year. The list of learning materials and activities 14    shall be organized, at a minimum, by grade level and 15    subject area.16        (2) Any procedures that are in effect at each school 17    for the documentation, review, or approval by the school's 18    administrators, principal, or teachers of the learning 19    materials and activities used for student instruction. 20    (c) Under this Section, a school board is required to 21report only the information that is necessary to identify the 22specific learning materials and activities used for student 23instruction at each school. The information reported must 24include the title and the author, the name of the 25organization, or the Internet address, as appropriate, 26associated with each of the learning materials or activities.   HB1268- 4 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1Nothing in this Section may be construed to require either of 2the following:3        (1) The publication of a digital reproduction of 4    learning materials on a school district's website.5        (2) A separate listing of the individual components of 6    learning materials produced as a single volume; however, 7    if the volume contains works by multiple authors, the 8    listing shall provide either a table of contents or an 9    Internet address that discloses the discrete works and 10    authors contained within the volume. 11    (d) By May 1 of each year, the State Board of Education 12shall notify a school district whether the school district is 13required to comply with this Section.14    (e) Under this Section, a school district may, but is not 15required to: 16        (1) update the report and post the updated report on 17    the district's website on an ongoing basis during the 18    school year, provided that the updated report is completed 19    by July 1 following the completion of the school year; and20        (2) utilize collaborative online document or 21    spreadsheet software that allows multiple authorized users 22    to update or make additions to the report on an ongoing 23    basis, provided that a link to the report is publicly 24    accessible on the district's website. 25    (f) Each school year's report under this Section shall 26remain publicly available on the school district's website at   HB1268- 5 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1least until the report for the following school year is 2completed and made publicly available on the district's 3website.  4    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)5    Sec. 34-18.88. Learning materials and activities report.6    (a) In this Section: 7    "Activities" includes, but is not limited to, student 8assemblies, guest lectures, educational events facilitated by 9a school's administration or staff, or educational events 10conducted by outside individuals or organizations. 11"Activities" does not include student presentations.12    "Learning materials" includes, but is not limited to, any 13of the following:14        (1) Instructional material that consists of content 15    that conveys to a student through a medium or a 16    combination of media the essential knowledge, information, 17    and skills pertaining to a subject included in a public 18    school curriculum. In this paragraph (1), "instructional 19    material" includes a book or books; workbooks; 20    supplementary materials; a combination of a book or books, 21    workbooks, and supplementary materials; computer software, 22    magnetic media, DVDs, CD-ROMs, computer courseware, online 23    services, or an electronic medium; or other means of 24    conveying information to a student or otherwise 25    contributing to the learning process through electronic   HB1268- 6 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1    means, including through open education resource 2    instructional material as described in paragraph (2) of 3    this definition.4        (2) Open education resource instructional material 5    that consists of teaching, learning, and research 6    resources that reside in the public domain or have been 7    released under an intellectual property license and allows 8    for the free use, reuse, modification, and sharing of 9    resources with others. In this paragraph (2), "open 10    education resource instructional material" includes full 11    courses, course materials, modules, textbooks, streaming 12    videos, tests or exams, software, or any other tools, 13    materials, or techniques used to support access to 14    knowledge and also includes State-developed open education 15    resource instructional material.16        (3) Teaching aids.17        (4) Any other material for student instruction in 18    which a student has the option to select the material.19    "Used for student instruction" means assigned, provided, 20or otherwise presented to a school's students in (i) any 21course for which students receive academic credit or (ii) any 22educational capacity in which participation of the student 23body is required by the school or in which a majority of the 24students in a particular grade level participate.25    (b) By July 15 of each year, the board shall report for 26each of the school district's schools the following   HB1268- 7 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1information in a prominent location on the district's website:2        (1) A list of the learning materials and activities 3    that were used for student instruction during the previous 4    school year. The list of learning materials and activities 5    shall be organized, at a minimum, by grade level and 6    subject area.7        (2) Any procedures that are in effect at each school 8    for the documentation, review, or approval by each 9    school's administrators, principal, or teachers of the 10    learning materials and activities used for student 11    instruction. 12    (c) Under this Section, the board is required to report 13only the information that is necessary to identify the 14specific learning materials and activities used for student 15instruction at each school. The information reported must 16include the title and the author, the name of the 17organization, or the Internet address, as appropriate, 18associated with each of the learning materials or activities. 19Nothing in this Section may be construed to require either of 20the following: 21        (1) The publication of a digital reproduction of 22    learning materials on the school district's website.23        (2) A separate listing of the individual components of 24    learning materials produced as a single volume; however, 25    if the volume contains works by multiple authors, the 26    listing shall provide either a table of contents or an   HB1268- 8 -LRB104 06115 LNS 16148 b1    Internet address that discloses the discrete works and 2    authors contained within the volume. 3    (d) Under this Section, the school district may, but is 4not required to: 5        (1) update the report and post the updated report on 6    the district's website on an ongoing basis during the 7    school year, provided that the updated report is completed 8    by July 1 following the completion of the school year; and9        (2) utilize collaborative online document or 10    spreadsheet software that allows multiple authorized users 11    to update or make additions to the report on an ongoing 12    basis, provided that a link to the report is publicly 13    accessible on the district's website. 14    (e) Each school year's report under this Section shall 15remain publicly available on the school district's website at 16least until the report for the following school year is 17completed and made publicly available on the district's 18website.  19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202025.